DIAGNOSTICS -

SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI-463

DI3QI-02

DTC

B0102/11 Short in D Squib Circuit (to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The D squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, the spiral cable and the steering wheel pad.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.
DTC B0102/11 is recorded when a ground short is detected in the D squib circuit.

* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

¢ Columnwire

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Steering wheel pad (D squib
e Short in D squib circuit (to ground) ] 9 pad (D squib)
. )  Spiralcable
¢ D squib malfunction )
B0102/11 . . * Airbag sensorassembly
* Spiral cable malfunction .
e Dashwire

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-452.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check D squib circuit.

H21259
H19231

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

CHECK:
' Measure the resistance between the body ground and D+ of the
D Squib Spiral ]Airbag orange connector onthe steeringwheel pad (D squib) side be-
A THTH] [JSensor tween the airbag sensor assembly and the steering wheel pad
[ Assembly (D squib) side.
OK:
D+

H10684

@

e )

Go to step 5.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)



DI-464

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

DLC3

afl/m ggg‘z:m:m:] Sensor

:l Airbag

:l Assembly

—_—

ON

DTC B0102/11

e

CG TC
H21272
H19230 ABO119
H10600 W02042

H10687
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect D+ and D- of the orange
connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib) side be-
tween the airbag sensor assembly and the steering wheel
pad (D squib).

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Check DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO0 102/11 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0102/11 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check D squib.

— :l Airbag

HIH e ] Sensor

D Squib :l Assembly

ON

%

DLC3 DTC B0102/11

A/ ==

CG '1¢

H21267
ABO119
H10600 W02042

H20688

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the steering wheel pad (D squib) to the spiral
cable.

Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

OK:

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO0 102/11 isnotoutput.

Codes other than code B0102/11 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace steering wheel pad (D squib).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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L

H21268
H19231

P2 [T [ Sensor

:l Assembly

H21130

@

5 [ Check spiral cable.
PREPARATION:
Column Wire Disconnect the spiral cable connector from the column wire.
D Squib ]Airbag CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the body ground and D+ ofthe
orange spiral cable connector onthe steeringwheel pad (D
squib) side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NG %;}ﬂace spiral cable.

6 Check column wire.

CDD:%':DE:T]%
D Squib {}

ColumnWire DashWire

:l Airbag
Sensor
] Assembly

H21269
H16856

H21131

@
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the column wire connector from the dash wire.
CHECK:
Measuretheresistance betweenthe body ground and D+ ofthe
columnwire connectoronthe spiral cable side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NG> pair orreplace columnwire.
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7 Check dash wire.
Dash Wire CHECK:

Column Wire Measure the resistance between the body ground and D+ of the
Spiral E ‘ Airbag dash wire connector on the column wire side.
CD DZ Cable:ﬂ B:D :| Sensor OK:

A I
D Squib {} :| ssembly

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

H21760 NG> Repair or replace dash wire.
H16856 H21132

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning par can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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